Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-508
Possession of burglar's tools; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of possession of burglar's tools if such person:

(a) Knowingly possesses any explosive, tool, instrument, key or lock adopted by a postal service for any box or other authorized receptacle for the deposit or delivery of mail, or other article adapted, designed, or commonly used for committing or facilitating the commission of an offense involving forcible entry into premises or theft by a physical taking; and

(b) Intends to use the explosive, tool, instrument, key, lock, or article, or knows some person intends ultimately to use it, in the commission of an offense of the nature described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section.

(2) Possession of burglar's tools is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 107;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 16.
July 18, 2026